Connecticut, session 2026, SB00154.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) Not later than January 1, 2027, the
2 Department of Social Services shall submit a report, in accordance with
3 the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint
4 standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of
5 matters relating to children, human services and appropriations. Such
6 report shall (1) describe each program administered by the department
7 that serves children or families, where eligibility for participation in
8 such program or the sliding fee for participation in such program is
9 based on a comparison between annual family income and the federal
10 poverty level, (2) estimate the total cost associated with the
11 administration of each such program, (3) estimate the anticipated total
12 cost associated with the administration of each such program if
13 eligibility for participation was expanded to include children and
14 families with an annual family income above the federal poverty level
sSB154 / File No. 8 1

sSB154 File No. 8
15 and below the ALICE Threshold of Financial Survival for the state, as
16 determined by the United Way of Connecticut, (4) estimate how many
17 additional children or families would be eligible for participation in
18 each such program if participation was expanded in the manner
19 described in subdivision (3) of this section, and (5) discuss the feasibility
20 of adopting the ALICE Threshold of Financial Survival in making
21 eligibility determinations for each such program.
22 Sec. 2. (Effective from passage) Not later than January 1, 2027, the
23 Department of Developmental Services shall submit a report, in
24 accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
25 to the joint standing committees of the General Assembly having
26 cognizance of matters relating to children, public health and
27 appropriations. Such report shall (1) describe each program
28 administered by the department that serves children or families, where
29 eligibility for participation in such program or the sliding fee for
30 participation in such program is based on a comparison between annual
31 family income and the federal poverty level, (2) estimate the total cost
32 associated with the administration of each such program, (3) estimate
33 the anticipated total cost associated with the administration of each such
34 program if eligibility for participation was expanded to include children
35 and families with an annual family income above the federal poverty
36 level and below the ALICE Threshold of Financial Survival for the state,
37 as determined by the United Way of Connecticut, (4) estimate how
38 many additional children or families would be eligible for participation
39 in each such program if participation was expanded in the manner
40 described in subdivision (3) of this section, and (5) discuss the feasibility
41 of adopting the ALICE Threshold of Financial Survival in making
42 eligibility determinations for each such program.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Sec. 2 from passage New section
sSB154 / File No. 8 2

sSB154 File No. 8
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(2), (3) and (4) and Section 2(2), (3) and (4), "list" was changed
to "estimate" for clarity.
KID Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB154 / File No. 8 3

sSB154 File No. 8
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $
Social Services, Dept. GF - Cost Up to
$150,000
Department of Developmental Services GF - Cost Up to
$150,000
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill will result in a cost to the Departments of Social Services
(DSS) and Developmental Services (DDS) of up to $150,000 per agency
in FY 27 to require a report related to agency programs serving children
or families.
The bill requires the agencies to detail each program administered by
the departments that (1) serves children or families, (2) uses a sliding fee
scale or is no cost to clients, and (3) bases eligibility on a comparison
between annual family income and the federal poverty level. The report
must assess the costs of expanding program eligibility to meet the state's
ALICE Threshold of Financial Survival, including estimates of the
additional children or families served and the overall feasibility of
adopting this threshold as a standard for assistance.
Given the data and analysis required in the report, the agencies will
need temporary or contracted staff to complete the report by January 1,
2027. For reference, the starting salary for a Social Services Program
Manger is $98,695 with associated fringe benefit costs of $41,274.
sSB154 / File No. 8 4

sSB154 File No. 8
The Out Years
The bill has no fiscal impact in the out years because the report is due
by January 1, 2027.
Sources: State of Connecticut Job Classes Website
sSB154 / File No. 8 5

sSB154 File No. 8
OLR Bill Analysis
sSB 154
AN ACT REQUIRING CERTAIN AGENCIES TO REPORT COSTS
ASSOCIATED WITH PROGRAMS SERVING CHILDREN AND
FAMILIES.